Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.08.320

Registration or transfer at designated agencies—Form and application.

For persons not performing an automatic voter registration transaction subject to RCW 29A.08.315:

(1) A person may register to vote or update their residential address information for a voter registration when applying for service or assistance and with each renewal, recertification, or change of address at agencies designated under RCW 29A.08.310.

(2) A prospective applicant shall initially be offered a form approved by the secretary of state designed to determine whether the person wishes to register to vote. The form must comply with all applicable state and federal statutes regarding content.

The form shall also contain a box that may be checked by the applicant to decline to register at the time of the transaction.

If the person indicates an interest in registering or has made no indication as to a desire to register or not register to vote, the person shall be given a mail-in voter registration application or a prescribed agency application as provided by RCW 29A.08.330.

[ 2023 c 466 s 10. Prior: 2004 c 267 s 119; 2004 c 266 s 7; 2003 c 111 s 223; prior: 1994 c 57 s 27. Formerly RCW 29.07.430.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2004 c 267: See note following RCW 29A.08.010.

Effective date—2004 c 266: See note following RCW 29A.04.575.

Severability—Effective date—1994 c 57: See notes following RCW 29A.16.040.